Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-175
Licensee Assistance Program; authorized; participation; immunity from liability; confidentiality; referral; limitation.

(1) The department may contract to provide a Licensee Assistance Program to credential holders regulated by the department. The program shall be limited to providing education, referral assistance, and monitoring of compliance with treatment for abuse of, dependence on, or active addiction to alcohol, any controlled substance, or any mind-altering substance and shall be limited to voluntary participation by credential holders.

(2)(a) Participation in the program shall be confidential, except that if any evaluation by the program determines that the abuse, dependence, or active addiction may be of a nature which constitutes a danger to the public health and safety by the person's continued practice or if the person fails to comply with any term or condition of a treatment plan, the program shall report the same to the director.

(b) Participation in the program shall not preclude the investigation of alleged statutory violations which could result in disciplinary action against the person's credential or criminal action against the person.

(3) Any report from any person or from the program to the department indicating that a credential holder is suffering from abuse of, dependence on, or active addiction to alcohol, any controlled substance, or any mind-altering substance that impairs the ability to practice the profession shall be treated as a complaint against such credential and shall subject such credential holder to discipline under sections 38-186 to 38-1,100.

(4) No person who makes such a report to the program or from the program to the department shall be liable in damages to any person for slander, libel, defamation of character, breach of any privileged communication, or other criminal or civil action of any nature, whether direct or derivative, for making such report or providing information to the program or department in accordance with this section. The identity of any person making such a report or providing information leading to the making of a report shall be confidential.

(5) Any person who contacts the department for information on or assistance in obtaining referral or treatment of himself or herself or any other person credentialed by the department for abuse of, dependence on, or active addiction to alcohol, any controlled substance, or any mind-altering substance that impairs the ability to practice the profession shall be referred to the program. Such inquiries shall not be used by the department as the basis for investigation for disciplinary action, except that such limitation shall not apply to complaints or any other reports or inquiries made to the department concerning persons who may be suffering from abuse of, dependence on, or active addiction to alcohol, any controlled substance, or any mind-altering substance that impairs the ability to practice the profession or when a complaint has been filed or an investigation or disciplinary or other administrative proceeding is in process.

Laws 1991, LB 456, § 8;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 13;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 403;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 121;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 25;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 31;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-172.01;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 322;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 75;

Laws 2016, LB750, § 3.